Utah statutes.
63G-6a-709.5.   Publication of award and scores.

The issuing procurement unit shall, on the day on which the award of a contract is announced, make available to each offeror and to the public a written statement that includes:

(1)  the name of the offeror to which the contract is awarded and the total score awarded by the evaluation committee to that offeror;

(2)  the total score awarded by the evaluation committee to each offeror to which the contract is not awarded, without identifying which offeror received which score; and

(3)  any cost-benefit analysis made, under Section 63G-6a-708, in relation to the request for proposals.



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

